Maine, session 132, LD420.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides annual funding for the 5-year period from fiscal year 2025-26 through
fiscal year 2029-30 to support the cost to the Carleton Project of adding up to 10 additional
students.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $150,000 $150,000